District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.71

Scope of practice for barbers.

For the purposes of this part, the term “practice of barbering” means providing or offering to the general public for a fee any of the following services solely for cosmetic purposes: cutting, dressing, singeing, shampooing, styling, or similar work performed upon the face, hair, hairpiece, or wig of a person; shaving or trimming of facial hair of a person; or massaging or applying cosmetic preparations to the face, neck, or scalp of a person. The practice of barbering shall not include manicuring, electrolysis, or the braiding or weaving of hair.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.71.